Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.21.161

Regulation of activities and enforcement of penal laws.

All code cities shall observe and enforce, in addition to its local regulations, the provisions of state laws relating to the conduct, location and limitation on activities as regulated by state law and shall supply police information to the *section on identification of the state patrol as required by chapter 43.43 RCW.

[ 1983 c 3 s 59; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.21.161.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The "section on identification" was renamed the "identification and criminal history section" by 2006 c 294 s 1.